Illinois, session 104th, HB4580.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Section 6.09 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/6.09)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 147.09)7    Sec. 6.09. (a) In order to facilitate the orderly 8transition of aged patients and patients with disabilities 9from hospitals to post-hospital care, whenever a patient who 10qualifies for the federal Medicare program is hospitalized, 11the patient shall be notified of discharge at least 24 hours 12prior to discharge from the hospital. With regard to pending 13discharges to a skilled nursing facility, the hospital must 14notify the case coordination unit, as defined in 89 Ill. Adm. 15Code 240.260, at least 24 hours prior to discharge. When the 16assessment is completed in the hospital, the case coordination 17unit shall provide a copy of the required assessment 18documentation directly to the nursing home to which the 19patient is being discharged prior to discharge. The Department 20on Aging shall provide notice of this requirement to case 21coordination units. When a case coordination unit is unable to 22complete an assessment in a hospital prior to the discharge of 23a patient, 60 years of age or older, to a nursing home, the   HB4580- 2 -LRB104 17693 BAB 31124 b1case coordination unit shall notify the Department on Aging 2which shall notify the Department of Healthcare and Family 3Services. The Department on Aging shall adopt rules to address 4these instances to ensure that the patient is able to access 5nursing home care, the nursing home is not penalized for 6accepting the admission, and the patient's timely discharge 7from the hospital is not delayed, to the extent permitted 8under federal law or regulation. Nothing in this subsection 9shall preclude federal requirements for a pre-admission 10screening/mental health (PAS/MH) as required under Section 112-201.5 of the Nursing Home Care Act or State or federal law or 12regulation. If home health services are ordered, the hospital 13must inform its designated case coordination unit, as defined 14in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 240.260, of the pending discharge and must 15provide the patient with the case coordination unit's 16telephone number and other contact information. 17    (b) Every hospital shall develop procedures for a 18physician with medical staff privileges at the hospital or any 19appropriate medical staff member to provide the discharge 20notice prescribed in subsection (a) of this Section. The 21procedures must include prohibitions against discharging or 22referring a patient to any of the following if unlicensed, 23uncertified, or unregistered: (i) a board and care facility, 24as defined in the Board and Care Home Act; (ii) an assisted 25living and shared housing establishment, as defined in the 26Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act; (iii) a facility   HB4580- 3 -LRB104 17693 BAB 31124 b1licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 2Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 3Care Act, or the MC/DD Act; (iv) a supportive living facility, 4as defined in Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code; 5or (v) a free-standing hospice facility licensed under the 6Hospice Program Licensing Act if licensure, certification, or 7registration is required. The Department of Public Health 8shall annually provide hospitals with a list of licensed, 9certified, or registered board and care facilities, assisted 10living and shared housing establishments, nursing homes, 11supportive living facilities, facilities licensed under the 12ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 13Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, and hospice 14facilities. Reliance upon this list by a hospital shall 15satisfy compliance with this requirement. The procedure may 16also include a waiver for any case in which a discharge notice 17is not feasible due to a short length of stay in the hospital 18by the patient, or for any case in which the patient 19voluntarily desires to leave the hospital before the 20expiration of the 24 hour period.21    (c) At least 24 hours prior to discharge from the 22hospital, the patient shall receive written information on the 23patient's right to appeal the discharge pursuant to the 24federal Medicare program, including the steps to follow to 25appeal the discharge and the appropriate telephone number to 26call in case the patient intends to appeal the discharge.  HB4580- 4 -LRB104 17693 BAB 31124 b1    (d) Before transfer of a patient to a long term care 2facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act where 3elderly persons reside, a hospital shall as soon as 4practicable initiate a name-based criminal history background 5check by electronic submission to the Illinois State Police 6for all persons between the ages of 18 and 70 years; provided, 7however, that a hospital shall be required to initiate such a 8background check only with respect to patients who:9        (1) are transferring to a long term care facility for 10    the first time;11        (2) have been in the hospital more than 5 days;12        (3) are reasonably expected to remain at the long term 13    care facility for more than 30 days;14        (4) have a known history of serious mental illness or 15    substance abuse; and16        (5) are independently ambulatory or mobile for more 17    than a temporary period of time.18    A hospital may also request a criminal history background 19check for a patient who does not meet any of the criteria set 20forth in items (1) through (5).21    A hospital shall notify a long term care facility if the 22hospital has initiated a criminal history background check on 23a patient being discharged to that facility. In all 24circumstances in which the hospital is required by this 25subsection to initiate the criminal history background check, 26the transfer to the long term care facility may proceed   HB4580- 5 -LRB104 17693 BAB 31124 b1regardless of the availability of criminal history results. 2Upon receipt of the results, the hospital shall promptly 3forward the results to the appropriate long term care 4facility. If the results of the background check are 5inconclusive, the hospital shall have no additional duty or 6obligation to seek additional information from, or about, the 7patient. 8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-102, eff. 1-1-24.)